Illinois, session 104th, SB3444.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Artificial Intelligence Safety Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act: 7    "Artificial intelligence model" means an engineered or 8machine-based component of a system that varies in its level 9of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, 10infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that 11can influence physical or virtual environments. 12    "Critical harm" means the death or serious injury of 100 13or more people or at least $1,000,000,000 of damages to rights 14in property caused or materially enabled by a frontier model, 15through either: 16        (1) the creation or use of a chemical, biological, 17    radiological, or nuclear weapon; or 18        (2) engaging in conduct that: 19            (A) acts with no meaningful human intervention; 20        and 21            (B) would, if committed by a human, constitute a 22        criminal offense that requires intent, recklessness, 23        or negligence, or the solicitation or aiding and   SB3444- 2 -LRB104 15770 SPS 28959 b1        abetting of such a crime. 2    "Developer" means a person or organization that has 3trained, or initiated the training of, at least one frontier 4model. 5    "Frontier model" means an artificial intelligence model 6that: (1) is trained using greater than 10^26 computational 7operations, such as integer or floating-point operations; or 8(2) has a compute cost that exceeds $100,000,000. 9    Section 10. Frontier model transparency. 10    (a) A developer shall not be held liable for critical 11harms if the developer did not intentionally or recklessly 12cause the critical harms and the developer: 13        (1) published a safety and security protocol on its 14    website that satisfies the requirements of Section 15 and 15    adhered to that safety and security protocol prior to the 16    release of the frontier model; 17        (2) published a transparency report on its website at 18    the time of the frontier model's release that satisfies 19    the requirements of Section 20. 20    The requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2) do not apply if 21the developer does not reasonably foresee any material 22difference between the frontier model's capabilities or risks 23of critical harm and a frontier model that was previously 24evaluated by the developer in a manner substantially similar 25to this Act.  SB3444- 3 -LRB104 15770 SPS 28959 b1    (b) If a developer has produced a safety and security 2protocol in a manner substantially similar to this Act, then 3the developer shall be deemed to have complied with subsection 4(a) if the developer: 5        (1) agrees to be bound by the safety and security 6    requirements adopted under Article 56 of the European 7    Union's Artificial Intelligence Act; or 8        (2) enters into an agreement with an agency of the 9    federal government that:10            (A) enables the agency to access the developer's 11        frontier models for the purposes of conducting 12        research and evaluations; 13            (B) facilitates the evaluation of frontier models, 14        such as an assessment of cyber and biological risks; 15        and 16            (C) allows for the federal government to release 17        information related to evaluations of frontier models 18        that have been publicly released.19    (c) A developer that enters into an agreement with an 20agency of the federal government under paragraph (2) of 21subsection (b) shall file a certification with the Attorney 22General, in a manner prescribed by the Attorney General, 23attesting that the developer has entered into an agreement 24that satisfies the requirements of paragraph (2) of subsection 25(b). It is a violation of this Act to make a materially false 26or misleading statement, or to omit a material fact, in any   SB3444- 4 -LRB104 15770 SPS 28959 b1certification submitted under this subsection. 2    Section 15. Requirements for safety and security 3protocols. 4    (a) In order to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (1) 5of subsection (a) of Section 10, a developer shall create a 6safety and security protocol that documents a developer's 7technical and organizational protocols to manage, assess, and 8mitigate risk of critical harm arising from the use and 9distribution of its frontier models. It shall include a 10high-level summary of: 11        (1) testing procedures that the developer uses to 12    assess risk of a reasonably foreseeable critical harms 13    arising from the deployment of a frontier model; 14        (2) thresholds used by the developer to identify and 15    assess whether a frontier model poses a critical risk, 16    including: 17            (A) how the developer will assess whether a 18        threshold has been attained, which may include 19        multiple tiered thresholds; and20            (B) an illustrative summary of the potential 21        actions the developer may take if each threshold is 22        attained; 23        (3) the mitigations that a developer takes to mitigate 24    reasonably foreseeable critical harms and how the 25    developer assesses the effectiveness of those mitigations;   SB3444- 5 -LRB104 15770 SPS 28959 b1        (4) whether and how a developer will use third parties 2    to assess risk of critical harm and capabilities or the 3    effectiveness of mitigations of critical harms; 4        (5) the developer's cybersecurity practices relating 5    to frontier models and how the developer secures 6    unreleased frontier model weights from unauthorized 7    modification or transfer by internal or external parties; 8        (6) to the extent that the frontier model is deployed 9    by the developer, a description of how the developer will 10    monitor for critical harm and how a developer would 11    respond; and12        (7) the process by which the developer determines when 13    a frontier model presents material new risks such that it 14    should be subject to additional assessments. 15    (b) A developer may make appropriate redactions to the 16information required under subsection (a), as necessary, to 17maintain model security and integrity, trade secrets, and 18proprietary information. 19    Section 20. Requirements for transparency reports. 20    (a) In order to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (2) 21of subsection (a) of Section 10, a developer shall create a 22transparency report that: 23        (1) identifies the frontier model that is the subject 24    of the transparency report; and25        (2) provides a summary of the results of assessments   SB3444- 6 -LRB104 15770 SPS 28959 b1    conducted in accordance with the developer's safety and 2    security protocol and the steps taken to address any 3    identified risks. 4    (b) A developer may make appropriate redactions to the 5information required under subsection (a), as necessary, to 6maintain model security and integrity, trade secrets, and 7proprietary information. 8    Section 25. Application of the Act. 9    (a) This Act shall no longer apply if the federal 10government enacts a law or adopts regulations that establish 11overlapping requirements for developers of frontier models. 12    (b) A developer shall be deemed to be in compliance with 13this Act if the developer is in compliance with another 14state's substantially similar frontier model safety and 15security framework.